Wisconsin, session 2025, AB740.
do enact as follows:AB740,11Section 1. 302.10 of the statutes is renumbered 302.10 (1) and amended to 2read:AB740,2,53302.10 (1) For violation of the rules of the prison an inmate may be confined 4to a solitary cell, under the care and advice of the physician, for a period of not more 5than 10 days.AB740,26Section 2. 302.10 (2) to (7) of the statutes are created to read:AB740,2,97302.10 (2) An inmate may not be confined to a solitary cell under sub. (1) 8unless at least 60 days have passed since the inmate was last released from a period 9of solitary confinement.AB740,3,210(3) If an inmate is confined to a solitary cell under sub. (1), the warden or 11superintendent of the prison shall provide to the inmate within 2 hours of 1confinement all of the following items, which shall be from the inmate’s personal 2property if applicable:AB740,3,33(a) At least one book that belongs to the inmate, of the inmate’s choice.AB740,3,44(b) Pen or pencil.AB740,3,55(c) At least 10 pieces of paper.AB740,3,66(d) At least 10 envelopes.AB740,3,77(e) The inmate’s personal address book.AB740,3,88(f) The following personal hygiene items:AB740,3,991. Soap.AB740,3,10102. Toothbrush.AB740,3,11113. Toothpaste.AB740,3,12124. Shampoo.AB740,3,13135. Deodorant.AB740,3,14146. If the inmate is menstruating, feminine hygiene products.AB740,3,1915(4) If an inmate who is pregnant is confined to a solitary cell under sub. (1), 16the warden or superintendent of the prison shall provide to the inmate within 2 17hours of confinement access to the inmate’s prenatal care team, including doula 18services, if applicable, via an in-person or a hybrid method that utilizes 19technological means.AB740,4,220(5) If an inmate is confined to a solitary cell under sub. (1), the warden or 21superintendent of the prison shall ensure that the inmate is allowed to access, 22within 24 hours of confinement, 3 25-minute visitation periods per week to be 23conducted via live audiovisual means. For the purposes of this subsection, a visitor 1may not be required to be physically present at the prison but shall be allowed to 2participate via remote access.AB740,4,123(6) If an inmate is confined to a solitary cell under sub. (1), the warden or 4superintendent of the prison shall ensure that, beginning within 48 hours of 5confinement, the inmate is provided with at least 15 hours per week of structured 6programming in his or her cell. The programming under this subsection may be 7completed entirely in person or via a hybrid method that utilizes technological 8means. The programming shall include, at a minimum, an in-person visit of at 9least 30 minutes on at least 2 separate days per week from the inmate’s assigned 10case manager and an in-person visit of at least 30 minutes on at least 5 separate 11days per week from a person representing any of the following departments, with no 12department visiting more than twice per week:AB740,4,1313(a) Health services.AB740,4,1414(b) Psychiatric services.AB740,4,1515(c) Chaplaincy.AB740,4,1616(d) Education.AB740,4,1717(e) Library services.AB740,4,1818(f) Recreation.AB740,4,2219(7) If an inmate is confined to a solitary cell under sub. (1), the warden or 20superintendent of the prison shall ensure that the inmate receives an in-person 21visit of at least 30 minutes on at least 2 separate days per week from any of the 22following persons:AB740,4,2323(a) The inmate’s housing unit manager.AB740,5,11(b) A corrections captain.AB740,5,22(c) A complaint examiner.AB740,5,33(d) A deputy warden or superintendent.AB740,5,44(e) The warden or superintendent.AB740,35Section 3. 302.40 of the statutes is renumbered 302.40 (1) and amended to 6read:AB740,5,97302.40 (1) For violating the rules of the jail, an inmate may be kept in 8confined to a solitary confinement cell, under the care and advice of a physician, but 9not over for a period of not more than 10 days.AB740,410Section 4. 302.40 (2) to (7) of the statutes are created to read:AB740,5,1311302.40 (2) An inmate may not be confined to a solitary cell under sub. (1) 12unless at least 60 days have passed since the inmate was last released from a period 13of solitary confinement.AB740,5,1614(3) If an inmate is confined to a solitary cell under sub. (1), the sheriff shall 15provide to the inmate within 2 hours of confinement all of the following items, 16which shall be from the inmate’s personal property if applicable:AB740,5,1717(a) At least one book that belongs to the inmate, of the inmate’s choice.AB740,5,1818(b) Pen or pencil.AB740,5,1919(c) At least 10 pieces of paper.AB740,5,2020(d) At least 10 envelopes.AB740,5,2121(e) The inmate’s personal address book. Down Down /2025/related/proposals/ab740 true proposaltext /2025/related/proposals/ab740 proposaltext/2025/REG/AB740 proposaltext/2025/REG/AB740 section true Menu»2025»Related Documents»Proposal Text»AB740: Bill Text × Details for PDF view Link (Permanent link) Bookmark this location View toggle Go to top of document Search in this chapter Search in this section Search in this agency Search in this chapter group Search in this chapter Search in this section Cross references for section Acts affecting this section References to this 1970 Statutes Annotations Appellate Court Citations Administrative Code Index Reference lines Clear highlighting